Utah statutes.
58-26a-303.    Term of license and registration -- Expiration -- Renewal.

(1)  The division shall issue each license and registration under this chapter in accordance with a two-year renewal cycle established by rule.  The division may by rule extend or shorten a renewal cycle by as much as one year to stagger the renewal cycles it administers.

(2)  At the time of renewal a licensee shall show satisfactory evidence of each of the following renewal requirements:

(a)  completion of qualified continuing education as required under Section 58-26a-304; and

(b)  successful completion of a peer review meeting the requirements established by rule by the division in collaboration with the board.

(3)  Each license or registration automatically expires on the date shown on the license or registration unless it is renewed in accordance with Section 58-1-308.

